Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202637-247.01
Wildlife abatement, defined.

Wildlife abatement means to frighten, flush, haze, take, or kill certain wildlife to manage depredation, damage, or other threats to human health and safety or commerce caused by such wildlife.

Laws 2019, LB374, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB979, § 2.
July 18, 2026